Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-837
Boundary bridge; bonds; petition for special election; bond for expenses.

Whenever a petition, setting forth the amount of bonds asked to be voted, when the same shall become due, the rate of interest the bonds shall bear, whether payable annually or semiannually, and if to aid in the construction of a bridge, the name of the person, firm or corporation to whom the bonds are to be donated, the amount of work to be done on such bridge before the bonds shall be delivered, and signed by not less than twenty freeholders of the county, township, precinct, city or village, which is to issue the bonds, shall be presented to the county board of the county which is to issue the bonds, or the county in which is located the township or precinct which is to issue the bonds, or the city council of the city which is to issue the bonds, or to the trustees of the village which is to issue the bonds, the county board, the city council or the village trustees shall, upon the petitioners' giving bond, to be approved by them, conditioned for the payment of the expenses of a special election in the event the proposition to be submitted shall not receive the requisite number of votes for its adoption, give notice and call a special election in the county, township, precinct, city or village.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 3, p. 188;

R.S.1913, § 2998;

C.S.1922, § 2750;

C.S.1929, § 39-836;

R.S.1943, § 39-837;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 103, p. 337.